dictionaries/ro-ro.dic
abrog/K
absorbirÄƒm/O
abÄƒturÄƒÈ›i/O
acceptaserÄƒm/O
acetific/K
acoperitÄƒ/O
acuz/K
acÄƒÈ›Ã¢nd/N
adopt/K
adormea/O
adurmec/K
adÄƒugaseÈ™i/O
afund/K
agiotÃ¢nd/N
airbag-ul/n
alerg/K
alergam/O
alung/K
amnistiind/N
amplific/K
anin/K
api-ul/n
aplecaÈ›i-i/O
aplic/K
aportÃ¢nd/N
apÄƒraserÄƒ/O
apÄƒsaÈ›i-vÄƒ/O
aridic/K
aromÃ¢nd/N
artwork-ul/n
ascuÈ›i/O
asist/K
astupÃ¢nd/N
asum/K
atroce/e
autocunoscÃ¢nd/N
autodemasc/K
azvÃ¢rlind/N
aÈ™ez/O
bagi/O
bandwidth-ul/n
baseball-ul/n
beatific/K
benchmark-ul/n
binemeritÃ¢nd/N
bip-ul/n
blitzkreig-ul/n
bluff-ul/n
bonus-ul/n
boot-loader-ul/n
bootloader-ul/n
bootsplash-ul/n
botezau/O
bridging-ul/n
brodÃ¢nd/N
browser-ul/n
bucur/K
bug-report-ul/n
bugraport-ul/n
business-ul/n
bytecode-ul/n
bÃ¢nd/N
bÄƒltind/N
bÄƒtÃ¢nd/NO
calific/K
call-ul/n
carbonatÃ¢nd/N
card-ul/n
cautÄƒ-o/O
cd-ul/n
cdrom-ul/n
certÄƒreÈ›/t
chamois-ul/n
chart-ul/n
chasse-ul/n
chateaubriand-ul/n
chemaseÈ›i/O
chewing-gum-ul/n
chiÈ›cÄƒind/N
citeÈ›/t
clarific/K
clip-ul/n
clorinÃ¢nd/N
clÄƒtinÄƒ/O
cocÃ¢rjind/N
coexist/K
combo-ul/n
combÄƒteÈ›i-l/O
compar/K
complÄƒcÃ¢nd/N
comunic/K
conferind/N
confirm/K
conjug/K
consist/K
consum/K
contraindic/K
contravenind/N
convocaseÈ™i/O
copyright-ul/n
coÈ™covind/N
credeÈ›i-o/O
critic/K
css-ul/n
cufundÃ¢nd/N
culc/K
cumpÄƒrarÄƒm/O
cunoÈ™te/O
cutremur/K
cÄƒlcÃ¢nd/NO
cÄƒlÄƒreÈ›/t
cÄƒpÄƒtam/O
cÄƒscaÈ›i-i/O
cÄƒzÃ¢nd/NO
cÄƒÈ›ÄƒraÈ™i/O
decalcific/K
deconspir/K
decÄƒlind/N
degazificÃ¢nd/N
delegai/O
delÄƒsÃ¢nd/N
demistific/K
denunÈ›/K
derapÃ¢nd/N
descalific/K
descoperiseÈ›i/O
descriind/NO
descriserÄƒm/O
descurcÄƒreÈ›/t
descÄƒrcaÈ›i-i/O
desec/K
desfidÃ¢nd/N
desfÄƒÈ™urasem/O
design-ul/n
despiedicÃ¢nd/N
destrÄƒmÃ¢nd/N
deux-pieces-ul/n
devenirÄƒ/O
dezambreind/N
dezemulsionÃ¢nd/N
dezgust/K
dezlegarÄƒÈ›i/O
dezmierdÃ¢nd/N
deÈ™teptÃ¢nd/N
dirt-track-ul/n
disip/K
display-ul/n
dispÄƒrÃ¢nd/NO
dizlocarÄƒÈ›i/O
domin/K
dormirÄƒÈ›i/O
dot-com-ul/n
drumeÈ›/t
ducÄƒreÈ›/t
dulce/e
dvd-ul/n
dÃ¢nd/NO
edific/K
eficace/e
ego-ul/n
eman/K
erbacee/e
estorc/K
excomunic/K
exist/K
exprim/K
fac/O
fast-food-ul/n
felicit/K
feroce/e
fierbinte/e
firewall-ul/n
flame-war-ul/n
fleÈ›/t
floppy-ul/n
fluierÃ¢nd/N
flutur/K
fps-ul/n
fumeg/K
fÄƒcuseÈ™i/O
fÄƒcÃ¢nd/NO
gadget-ul/n
ghetto-ul/n
glorific/K
gui-ul/n
harddisc-ul/n
header-ul/n
hidroplanÃ¢nd/N
host-ul/n
hrÄƒpÄƒreÈ›/t
http-ul/n
identific/K
iertaÈ™i/O
iertÃ¢nd/NO
implor/K
inculp/K
index-ul/n
indurÃ¢nd/N
ineficace/e
instig/K
interferÃ¢nd/N
intrig/K
intrÄƒm/O
ip-ul/n
irit/K
isteÈ›/t
iubeÈ›/t
iute/e
jnÄƒpÄƒind/N
juke-box-ul/n
justific/K
keymap-ul/n
laptop-ul/n
laudÄƒ-ne/O
legÄƒm/O
limpede/e
linux-ul/n
load-ul/n
lunec/K
luÃ¢nd/NO
lÄƒsat/O
lÄƒtÄƒreÈ›/t
macro-ul/n
malignizÃ¢nd/N
malware-ul/n
memo-ul/n
mestec/K
mistreÈ›/t
miÈ™c/K
motrice/e
mount-ul/n
moÈ›Äƒind/N
multiplayer-ul/n
multiplic/K
muriÈ›i/O
muÈ™luind/N
mÃ¢nc/K
mÃ¢rÃ¢ind/N
mÄƒlÄƒieÈ›/t
mÄƒnÃ¢nc/O
mÄƒsuraÈ›i-vÄƒ/O
neavÃ¢nd/N
necesit/K
neezit/K
nemaicunoaÈ™tem/O
nemaifiind/N
nepotrivind/N
network-ul/n
nevrÃ¢nd/N
neÃ®ncrede-le/O
neÃ®nvÄƒÈ›aÈ›i/O
nickname-ul/n
nitrific/K
nÄƒmeÈ›ind/N
nÄƒscÃ¢nd/NO
nÄƒtÄƒfleÈ›/t
ocup/K
offset-ul/n
omorÃ¢se/O
orbÄƒcÄƒind/N
pacific/K
panel-ul/n
pc-ul/n
persecutÃ¢nd/N
persist/K
perspicace/e
petrecÄƒreÈ›/t
ph-ul/n
piaptÄƒnai/O
pieptÄƒn/K
pierdut-o/O
pipetÃ¢nd/N
pixmap-ul/n
pizmÄƒreÈ›/t
plec/O
pleoscÄƒind/N
plimb/K
plimbÄƒreÈ›/t
plÃ¢ngÄƒreÈ›/t
pogorau/O
preced/K
precoce/e
precomprimÃ¢nd/N
prefac/O
prefer/K
pregetÃ¢nd/N
premergÃ¢nd/N
preumblÃ¢nd/N
prevedeau/O
prezentaÈ™i/O
pricepÃ¢nd/NO
printer-ul/n
procur/K
propag/K
propice/e
provocam/O
provocÃ¢nd/NO
puric/K
pursÃ¢nge/e
purta/O
purtÄƒreÈ›/t
pusnicind/N
pÄƒduchind/N
pÄƒdureÈ›/t
pÄƒrurÄƒm/O
quiproquo-ul/n
rapace/e
raposodiind/N
rarific/K
reabate-le/O
readÄƒugÃ¢nd/NO
reagÄƒÈ›Ã¢nd/NO
realergaÈ›i-l/O
reaportÃ¢nd/N
rece/e
rectific/K
recumpÄƒraÈ›i-i/O
recuzÃ¢nd/N
refugiind/N
relativizÃ¢nd/N
remote-ul/n
renaÈ™tem/O
repar/K
repetÃ¢nd/N
rescriai/O
restituind/N
retrÄƒseseÈ›i/O
revizuind/N
revoc/K
rezist/K
reÃ®ncarnÃ¢nd/N
reÃ®ncercaserÄƒ/O
reÃ®nvÄƒÈ›aseÈ™i/O
reÃ®nÄƒlÈ›Ã¢nd/N
ripper-ul/n
risc/K
root-ul/n
rugÄƒ/O
runlevel-ul/n
rÃ¢gÃ¢ind/N
rÄƒmÃ¢nÃ¢nd/N
rÄƒscuseseÈ™i/O
rÄƒsfierbÃ¢nd/N
rÄƒspic/K
rÄƒsÄƒriserÄƒ/O
rÄƒzbubuind/N
rÄƒzleÈ›/t
salut/K
sanctificÃ¢nd/N
scade-le/O
scheunÃ¢nd/N
schweizer-ul/n
scrie-te/O
scripting-ul/n
scuipÃ¢nd/N
scutur/K
scÄƒpaÈ›i-mÄƒ/O
sec/O
semeÈ›/t
semnificÃ¢nd/N
serverul/n
shelter-deck-ul/n
shutdown/n
simplific/K
simÈ›iÈ›i/O
slice-ul/n
smiley-ul/n
sodomizÃ¢nd/N
soft-ul/n
spelling-ul/n
spintec/K
spÄƒrseseÈ™/O
ssh-ul/n
statement-ul/n
stingÃ¢nd/N
stream-ul/n
strecurau/O
strip-tease-ul/n
strÄƒmut/K
stÄƒtuserÄƒm/O
subÃ®mpÄƒrÈ›ind/N
subÈ›ire/e
suflec/K
sun/K
supertrust-ul/n
suprasaturÃ¢nd/N
swap-ul/n
sÄƒlbÄƒtÄƒcind/N
sÄƒltÄƒ/O
sÄƒltÄƒreÈ›/t
tag-ul/n
tarnsport/K
task-ul/n
teletype-ul/n
tenace/e
timeout-ul/n
tonific/K
tooltips-ul/n
trademark-ul/n
transcenzÃ¢nd/N
transcrie-o/O
transpir/K
trÄƒseÈ™i/O
tty-ul/n
tun/K
tÃ¢rÃ¢ind/N
umblÄƒreÈ›/t
umflu/K
umount-ul/n
umplu/O
upload-ul/n
urlu/K
usturoind/N
veniseÈ™i/O
verde/e
verific/K
veto-ul/n
vitrific/K
vivace/e
vorace/e
vortex-ul/n
vÃ¢jÃ¢ind/N
vÃ¢rÃ¢rÄƒm/O
vÄƒicÄƒreÈ›/t
vÄƒitÄƒreÈ›/t
wc-ul/n
webcam-ul/n
wizard-ul/n
xml-ul/n
zburd/K
zbÃ¢nÈ›uind/N
zvÃ¢ntÃ¢nd/N
zÃ¢mbÄƒreÈ›/t
zÄƒceai/O
Ã®mbuc/K
Ã®mbÄƒtÃ¢nd/N
Ã®mpacÄƒ-mÄƒ/O
Ã®mplÃ¢nt/K
Ã®mpÄƒrÈ›it/GO
Ã®nalbÄƒstrind/N
Ã®ncercam/O
Ã®ncheg/K
Ã®ncovrig/K
Ã®ncÄƒierÃ¢nd/N
Ã®ncÄƒlcarÄƒÈ›i/O
Ã®ncÄƒlÈ›aÈ›i-le/O
Ã®ndemnat/O
Ã®ndrept/K
Ã®nfigÄƒreÈ›/t
Ã®nfoind/N
Ã®nfrunt/K
Ã®nfunde/O
Ã®nfÄƒÈ›aserÄƒ/O
Ã®ngropaÈ›i-o/O
Ã®ngrÄƒÈ™Ã¢nd/N
Ã®ngÃ¢n/K
Ã®nnÄƒbuÈ™iseÈ›i/O
Ã®nrourÃ¢nd/N
Ã®nsoarÄƒ-te/O
Ã®nspic/K
Ã®ntemeiezi/O
Ã®ntrebaÈ™i/O
Ã®ntrepÄƒtrund/N
Ã®ntrevÄƒzuserÄƒm/O
Ã®ntÄƒrÃ¢t/K
Ã®nveÈ›i/O
Ã®nvÃ¢rteÈ™ti/O
Ã®nÄƒlÈ›aÈ›i-l/O
Ã®nÄƒlÈ›Ã¢nd/NO
Ã®nÈ™facaÈ›i-vÄƒ/O
È™ede-i/O
È™ugubeÈ›/t
È›esere/Ae
È›Ã¢È›Ã¢ind/N
